Utah statutes.
52-4-305.   Criminal penalty for closed meeting violation.

In addition to any other penalty under this chapter, a member of a public body who knowingly or intentionally violates or who knowingly or intentionally abets or advises a violation of any of the closed meeting provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 263, 2006 General Session

